src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON LOSSAT  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final t  Pred. geahppat and lossat, words with bisyllable form comparatives in addition to trisyllable form: geahpit, losit
 :a%> ATTR ;
 +Use/NG:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4b K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:i%>X4b ATTRCONT ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:i%>X4b K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:i%>X4b K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4buš%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:i»X4bužž K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:i»X4bužž%> R ;	we overgenerate		! test this
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgGen:i»X4bužž%> R ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:i%>X4bu%>sa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:i%>X4buiddá%> NPx1V ;
! +Der2+Der/Superl+A:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; !Replaced to avoid adverb losimusat etc.
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Attr:i%>X4mus K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4muss K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:i%>X4muss%> R ;			! test this
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgGen:i%>X4muss%> R ;
! +Der2+Der/Superl+A:i%>X4mus VUOHTA ; !XXX Really?
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4mussa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 :ad%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :ad%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:i%>X4musat K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:i%>X4but K ;


LEXICON CAVGAT  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a/es-Attr. and final t Pred, both -but and -eappot comparatives
 +Dial/-KJ:a%> ATTR ;
 +Dial/-GG:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 +Dial/-KJ:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
! :ga%> BU/MUS ; causes adv čavggat, replaced by next two:
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-GG:ga%>b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-GG:ga%>muss BUOREMUS ;
 :ad%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :ad%> GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON CIENAL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Strong Grade is-Attr.
 :%>X2is ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
! :%>X2 GARRAS- ; ! GARRAS- removed
! :%>X4 GARAS0 ; ! GARAS0 removed

LEXICON NJUORAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj., with Strong Grade a-Attr.
 +Use/NG:%> ATTR ;
 :s GAPPUS ;

LEXICON DILDDAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-ld-(#=is) Trisyll Grad., facult is-Attr.
 +Use/NG:%>X4is ATTR ;
 GAPPUS ;

LEXICON VUOGAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Trisyll. adj. with gradation I-III and no sep. attr. only this word, vuogas, vuohkkasat
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 :%>Y9 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>Y9 EABBO/EAMOS ;

LEXICON HEAHKAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-hkk-#=is heahkka Trisyll Grad., is-Attr & heahkka
 :%>X4sis ATTR ;
 GARAS ;

LEXICON EATTAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-dd-#=is Trisyll. Grad. C-Adj. with WeG -is Attr.
 :%>X4is ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BOAKKAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-gg-#boagge9- Trisyll no attr
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON FARGAT  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  :d#Ø Trisyll no attr
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
 :»X7# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
!+Cmp/SgNom#:»X7 NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.


LEXICON GAPPUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -bbo- Trisyll, attr same as pred
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VATTIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Trisyll CG, -es/-is Attr
 +Use/NG:%>W1 ATTR ;
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BIEKKUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-iggo-#=is Trisyll Grad, is-Attr,
 :%>X4is ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON LIEKKUSattr
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Use/NG:%>X4is ATTR ;


LEXICON LIEKKUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-iggo-(#=is) Trisyll Grad,  attr same as pred
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Use/NG:%>X4is ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON GUOROS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  guoros and luovos, Trisyll Grad,  attr same as pred
 :%>W1 ATTR ;
 +Ess:%>W1in K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>W1 K ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;


LEXICON NUOLUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-u8llo-(#nuolo9s)
 :%>W1 ATTR ;
 +Err/Orth:%>X4 ATTR ; ! nuolus
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON GEARGGUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-ergo-#gearggo9s
 :%>W1 ATTR ;
 :%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VUDDJII !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 :%>Y5s ATTR ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:%>jW1 R ;
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! also VUOHTA, but with j
 +Use/NG+Use/-PLX: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, without j
 :%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

LEXICON VUDDJII_DECLINED  !!≈ * **@CODE@** misses most cases
 :%>Y5s ATTR ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:%>jW1 R ;
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! also VUOHTA, but with j
 +Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, without j , rábmevuohta
 +Err/Orth:%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; !replaced by the 3 following indivudual pointers
 +Sg+Acc:%>Y5 K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Y5jd K ;


 LEXICON JIEDNAI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>jit K ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:%>t K ; !jierbmát
 :%>Q3s ATTR ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:%>jW1 R ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>n K ; !jierbmán, veahkkán
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! VUOHTA j
 +Err/Orth: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j
 :%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>Y5b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>Y5muss BUOREMUS ;

 LEXICON JIEDNAI_DECLINED  !!≈ * **@CODE@** misses most cases
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>jit K ;
 :%>Q3s ATTR ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:%>jW1 R ;
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! VUOHTA j
 +Err/Orth: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j
! :%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; !replaced by the 3 following indivudual pointers
 +Sg+Acc:%>Y5 K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/-Spell:%>Y5jd K ; !riiduid, ruvsuid
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>Y5b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>Y5muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Dial/-GG:s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! østlig, err/orth? 

LEXICON NJOLVAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@** njolvái #njolvás. No further declination(?) ref. Nielsen's dictionary.
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>jit K ;
 :%>Q3s ATTR ;
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! Nominative, essive and VUOHTA j
 +Err/Orth: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j

 LEXICON ELLUI !!≈ * **@CODE@** ellui #ellos. No further declination(?) ref. Nielsen's dictionary.
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>jit K ;
 :%>Q3s ATTR ;
 :%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! Nominative, essive and VUOHTA j
 +Err/Orth: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j

LEXICON BOARIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  As GAPPUS, but with different attr.
 :%>W1s ATTR ;
 :s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BOARIS_NOCOMP !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 :%>W1s ATTR ;
! :s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON IIDNA_NOCOMP  !!≈ * **@CODE@**   
 +Sg+Nom:ijdna K ;
        :ijdna ATTR ;
+Err/Orth:ina ATTR ;
 :ijdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;



LEXICON IIVA_NOCOMP  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  IIVA_A without comparatives
:ijºva BOREALA ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ijvat K ;


LEXICON IIVA_A  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  loans ending with -a, same attr as pred
:ijºva FRIIJA ;
+Err/Orth:ijva FRIIJA_CG ;

LEXICON GENERELLA
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Attr: K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 :%>X4 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
