src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective !!= * **@CODE@** is a long list of lexicalised eahpe-prefixed adjs
eahpevárddus+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:eahpe#várddosis LIEKKUSattr ;
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
bieđut+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bieđuh FARGAT ;
dielvvis+A+Sem/Dummytag:dielºvi BOARIS ;
ealus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eallus BIEKKUS ;
fargat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:fargad FARGAT ;
faŋkkas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:faŋºkas BOAKKAS ;
fiktiiva+A+Sem/Dummytag:fikt IIVA_A ;
geahppat+A+Sem/Dummytag:geahpp LOSSAT ;
generealla+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:generelºla GENERELLA ;
gielddus+A+Sem/Dummytag:gielºdus GEARGGUS ;
givas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:givvas EATTAS ;
gonagasivdnenjuolgat+A+Sem/Dummytag:gonagas#ivdne#njuolg CAVGAT ;
gudnedievas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gudne#dievvas GAPPUS ;
guoibmái+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guojbmá JIEDNAI ;
guoros+A+Sem/Dummytag:guorro7s GUOROS ;
heahkas+A+Sem/Dummytag:heahkka HEAHKAS "surprising A" ;
háissas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hájºsa HEAHKAS ;
iešsihkar+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ieš#sihkar CIENAL ;
intrusiiva+A+Sem/Dummytag:in^trus IIVA_NOCOMP  ;
itkkus+A+Sem/Dummytag:itºkus BIEKKUS ;
juorbbas+A+Sem/Dummytag:juorºbas EATTAS ;
jáffui+A+Sem/Dummytag:jáffo JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
kulttorsensitiiva+A+Sem/Dummytag:kulttor#sensit IIVA_A ;
lamas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lapmas BOAKKAS ;
libmii+A+Sem/Dummytag:libme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
liekkus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lieggus LIEKKUS "warm A" ;
lihkadanlámis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lihkadan#lápmis VATTIS ;
lossat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:loss LOSSAT ;
luomus+A+Sem/Dummytag:luopmus NUOLUS ;
luovos+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:luovvo7s GUOROS ;
luovus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:luovvus GEARGGUS ;
láittas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lájºtas DILDDAS ;
láskkonjuolgat+A+Sem/Dummytag:láskko7#njuolg CAVGAT ;
maskuliidna+A+Sem/Dummytag:maskul IIDNA_NOCOMP ;
mariidna+A+Sem/Dummytag:mar IIDNA_NOCOMP ;
ultramariidna+A+Sem/Dummytag:ultra^mar IIDNA_NOCOMP ;
meahccái+A+Sem/Dummytag:meahccá JIEDNAI ;
miehtedoaris+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:miehti#doarri BOARIS ;
njolvái+A+Sem/Hum:njolºvá NJOLVAI ;
nuolus+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuollus NUOLUS ;
nálggas+A+Sem/Dummytag:nálºga HEAHKAS ;
námas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:námmas DILDDAS ;
oamivanhurskkis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Hum:oami#vánhursºkis GAPPUS ; ! !
parallealla+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:parallelºla GENERELLA ;
produktiiva+A+Sem/Dummytag:produkt IIVA_A ;
raddelámis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:radde7#lápmis VATTIS ;
roattus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:roaddus LIEKKUS ;
vilgesránis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vilges#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
buolašránis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:buolaš#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
rábmii+A+Sem/Dummytag:rábme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
ráđas+A+Sem/Dummytag:ráđđa NJUORAS ;
sealbbus+A+Sem/Dummytag:sealºbus NUOLUS ;
sihkar+A+Sem/Hum+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sihkkar CIENAL "sure A" ; ! alternating forms hk ~ hkk
sirkŋas+A+Sem/Dummytag:sirgŋas BOAKKAS ;
skieras+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skierras EATTAS ;
stoaiddas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stoajºda NJUORAS ;
suokkis+A+Sem/Dummytag:suoggi BOARIS ;
suoksái+A+Sem/Dummytag:suoksá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
suovat+A+Sem/Dummytag:suovad FARGAT ;
vehkkii+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vehkke VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
vilddus+A+Sem/Dummytag:vilºdus BIEKKUS ;
viŋkilnjuolgat+A+Sem/Dummytag:viŋkil#njuolg CAVGAT ;
vuogas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuohºkas VUOGAS ;
vuoitosihkar+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuoito#sihkkar CIENAL ;
vuostefápmoadversatiiva+A+Sem/Dummytag:vuoste#fápmo#adversat IIVA_NOCOMP  ;
vádjet+A+Sem/Dummytag:vádjed DILDDAS ;
válmmas+A+Sem/Dummytag:válbmas GAPPUS ;
várddus+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:várºdus LIEKKUSattr ;
čielgelámis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čielge7#lápmis VATTIS ;
čielggus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čielºgus GEARGGUS ;
čoarvái+A+Sem/Ani:čoarvá JIEDNAI ;
čuvgesránis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čuvges#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
čálggas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čálºga NJUORAS ;
elljui+A+Sem/Dummytag:ellju ELLUI ;
njaŋgui+A+Sem/Dummytag:njaŋgu ELLUI ;
šloŋgui+A+Sem/Dummytag:šloŋgu ELLUI ;
mannái+A+Sem/Dummytag:manná JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
biikii+A+Sem/Dummytag:biike VUDDJII ;
gavjii+A+Sem/Dummytag:gavje VUDDJII ;
soktii+A+Sem/Dummytag:sokte VUDDJII ;
